Tennessee, session 114, SB1886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5404(d)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2)
(A) An executive committee composed of six (6) members, including the:
(i) Commissioner;
(ii) Chair of the board;
(iii) Vice chair of the board; and
(iv) One (1) member representing each grand division of this
state.
(B) The commissioner shall serve as chair of the executive committee.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5404(i), is amended by deleting
the last sentence of the subsection and substituting:
The hall of fame's personnel are subject to an annual performance review by the
commissioner or a direct supervisor of such personnel. Upon completion of the review,
findings shall be presented to the board.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5405(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
Direct the mission of the hall of fame, including setting strategic direction and
overseeing financial stability and resources;
SB1886
011265
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5405(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the first sentence in the subdivision and substituting:
At least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each calendar year, the board
shall submit a plan for operation to the commissioner for review and approval.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011265